Hawaii statutes.
[§431:2D-103] Domestic responsibility and
deference to other states. (a) The commissioner shall be responsible for
conducting market conduct examinations for policyholder protection, which shall
be accomplished by comprehensive or targeted examinations of domestic insurers
or the affiliates of domestic insurers and targeted examinations of foreign
insurers or the affiliates of foreign insurers as deemed necessary by the
commissioner, based on the results of market analysis. The commissioner may
delegate responsibility for conducting an examination of a domestic insurer,
foreign insurer, or an affiliate of an insurer to the insurance commissioner of
another state if that state's insurance commissioner agrees to accept the
delegated responsibility for the examination.

(b) The commissioner may delegate
responsibility to an insurance commissioner of a state in which the domestic
insurer, foreign insurer, or affiliate has a significant number of policies or
significant premium volume, as determined by the commissioner by rule.

(c) If the commissioner elects to delegate
responsibility for examining an insurer, the commissioner shall accept a report
of the examination prepared by the commissioner to whom the responsibility has
been delegated.

(d) In lieu of conducting a market conduct
examination of an insurer, the commissioner shall accept a report of a market
conduct examination on the insurer prepared by the insurance commissioner of
the insurer's state of domicile or another state; provided:

(1) The laws of that state applicable to the subject
of the examination are deemed by the commissioner to be substantially similar
to those of this State;

(2) The examining state has a market conduct
surveillance system that the commissioner deems comparable to the market
conduct surveillance system required under this article; and

(3) The examination from the other state's insurance
commissioner has been conducted within the past three years.

(e) If the insurance commissioner to whom the
examination responsibility was delegated pursuant to subsection (a) or the
report of a market conduct examination prepared by the insurance commissioner
of another state pursuant to subsection (d), did not evaluate the specific area
or issue of concern to the commissioner, the commissioner may pursue a targeted
examination or market analysis of the unexamined area pursuant to this article.

(f) The commissioner's determination under
subsection (d) is discretionary and is not subject to appeal.

(g) Subject to a determination under
subsection (d), if a market conduct examination conducted by another state
results in a finding that an insurer should modify a specific practice or
procedure, the commissioner shall accept documentation that the insurer has
made a similar modification in this State, in lieu of initiating a market
conduct action or examination related to that practice or procedure. The
commissioner may require other or additional practice or procedure
modifications as are necessary to achieve compliance with specific state laws
or regulations, which differ substantially from those of the state that
conducted the examination. [L 2007, c 227, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next